South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5672.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The South Carolina Department of Environmental Services is directed to develop, in collaboration with the United States Environmental Protection Agency, comprehensive PFAS guidelines that, at minimum, establish science-based thresholds for safe and dangerous levels of PFAS in the following: (1) drinking water, including both public water systems and private wells; (2) surface waters, including rivers, streams, lakes, and reservoirs used for recreational or water supply purposes; (3) groundwater; and (4) soil, including residential, agricultural, and industrial soil. (B) The guidelines developed pursuant to this section must, at minimum: (1) identify specific PFAS compounds of concern as well as such additional compounds the department determines present a significant risk to public health or to the environment; (2) establish distinct threshold values, based on the best available peer-reviewed science, that delineate: (a) levels of PFAS concentrations that are considered safe for human health and environmental use; (b) levels of PFAS concentrations that warrant increased monitoring, public notification, and precautionary measures; and (c) levels of PFAS concentrations that are deemed dangerous, necessitating immediate remediation, public notification, and regulatory intervention; and (3) give special consideration to the protection of vulnerable populations, including infants, children, pregnant women, the elderly, and communities with higher rates of PFAS exposure due to proximity to contamination sources. (C) The department must submit a written report, including its findings and proposed PFAS guidelines, to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than one year following the effective date of this Joint Resolution. (D) For purposes of this section, "PFAS" means per- and polyfluoroalkyl substance. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor and is repealed one year after the effective date of this joint resolution unless reauthorized by the General Assembly. ----XX----